tests/numerals/percents.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen:  ../../tat.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../../tat.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "numbers in nom":
    1<num><percent><subst><nom> : "1%"
    2<num><percent><subst><nom> : "2%"
    3<num><percent><subst><nom> : "3%"
    4<num><percent><subst><nom> : "4%"
    5<num><percent><subst><nom> : "5%"
    6<num><percent><subst><nom> : "6%"
    7<num><percent><subst><nom> : "7%"
    8<num><percent><subst><nom> : "8%"
    9<num><percent><subst><nom> : "9%"
    10<num><percent><subst><nom> : "10%"
    11<num><percent><subst><nom> : "11%"
    12<num><percent><subst><nom> : "12%"
    13<num><percent><subst><nom> : "13%"
    14<num><percent><subst><nom> : "14%"
    15<num><percent><subst><nom> : "15%"
    16<num><percent><subst><nom> : "16%"
    17<num><percent><subst><nom> : "17%"
    18<num><percent><subst><nom> : "18%"
    19<num><percent><subst><nom> : "19%"
    20<num><percent><subst><nom> : "20%"
    21<num><percent><subst><nom> : "21%"
    22<num><percent><subst><nom> : "22%"
    23<num><percent><subst><nom> : "23%"
    24<num><percent><subst><nom> : "24%"
    25<num><percent><subst><nom> : "25%"
    26<num><percent><subst><nom> : "26%"
    27<num><percent><subst><nom> : "27%"
    28<num><percent><subst><nom> : "28%"
    29<num><percent><subst><nom> : "29%"
    30<num><percent><subst><nom> : "30%"
    31<num><percent><subst><nom> : "31%"
    32<num><percent><subst><nom> : "32%"
    33<num><percent><subst><nom> : "33%"
    34<num><percent><subst><nom> : "34%"
    35<num><percent><subst><nom> : "35%"
    36<num><percent><subst><nom> : "36%"
    37<num><percent><subst><nom> : "37%"
    38<num><percent><subst><nom> : "38%"
    39<num><percent><subst><nom> : "39%"
    40<num><percent><subst><nom> : "40%"
    41<num><percent><subst><nom> : "41%"
    42<num><percent><subst><nom> : "42%"
    43<num><percent><subst><nom> : "43%"
    44<num><percent><subst><nom> : "44%"
    45<num><percent><subst><nom> : "45%"
    46<num><percent><subst><nom> : "46%"
    47<num><percent><subst><nom> : "47%"
    48<num><percent><subst><nom> : "48%"
    49<num><percent><subst><nom> : "49%"
    50<num><percent><subst><nom> : "50%"
    51<num><percent><subst><nom> : "51%"
    52<num><percent><subst><nom> : "52%"
    53<num><percent><subst><nom> : "53%"
    54<num><percent><subst><nom> : "54%"
    55<num><percent><subst><nom> : "55%"
    56<num><percent><subst><nom> : "56%"
    57<num><percent><subst><nom> : "57%"
    58<num><percent><subst><nom> : "58%"
    59<num><percent><subst><nom> : "59%"
    60<num><percent><subst><nom> : "60%"
    61<num><percent><subst><nom> : "61%"
    62<num><percent><subst><nom> : "62%"
    63<num><percent><subst><nom> : "63%"
    64<num><percent><subst><nom> : "64%"
    65<num><percent><subst><nom> : "65%"
    66<num><percent><subst><nom> : "66%"
    67<num><percent><subst><nom> : "67%"
    68<num><percent><subst><nom> : "68%"
    69<num><percent><subst><nom> : "69%"
    70<num><percent><subst><nom> : "70%"
    71<num><percent><subst><nom> : "71%"
    72<num><percent><subst><nom> : "72%"
    73<num><percent><subst><nom> : "73%"
    74<num><percent><subst><nom> : "74%"
    75<num><percent><subst><nom> : "75%"
    76<num><percent><subst><nom> : "76%"
    77<num><percent><subst><nom> : "77%"
    78<num><percent><subst><nom> : "78%"
    79<num><percent><subst><nom> : "79%"
    80<num><percent><subst><nom> : "80%"
    81<num><percent><subst><nom> : "81%"
    82<num><percent><subst><nom> : "82%"
    83<num><percent><subst><nom> : "83%"
    84<num><percent><subst><nom> : "84%"
    85<num><percent><subst><nom> : "85%"
    86<num><percent><subst><nom> : "86%"
    87<num><percent><subst><nom> : "87%"
    88<num><percent><subst><nom> : "88%"
    89<num><percent><subst><nom> : "89%"
    90<num><percent><subst><nom> : "90%"
    91<num><percent><subst><nom> : "91%"
    92<num><percent><subst><nom> : "92%"
    93<num><percent><subst><nom> : "93%"
    94<num><percent><subst><nom> : "94%"
    95<num><percent><subst><nom> : "95%"
    96<num><percent><subst><nom> : "96%"
    97<num><percent><subst><nom> : "97%"
    98<num><percent><subst><nom> : "98%"
    99<num><percent><subst><nom> : "99%"
    100<num><percent><subst><nom> : "100%"
    1<num><percent> : "1%"
    2<num><percent> : "2%"
    3<num><percent> : "3%"
    4<num><percent> : "4%"
    5<num><percent> : "5%"
    6<num><percent> : "6%"
    7<num><percent> : "7%"
    8<num><percent> : "8%"
    9<num><percent> : "9%"
    10<num><percent> : "10%"
    11<num><percent> : "11%"
    12<num><percent> : "12%"
    13<num><percent> : "13%"
    14<num><percent> : "14%"
    15<num><percent> : "15%"
    16<num><percent> : "16%"
    17<num><percent> : "17%"
    18<num><percent> : "18%"
    19<num><percent> : "19%"
    20<num><percent> : "20%"
    21<num><percent> : "21%"
    22<num><percent> : "22%"
    23<num><percent> : "23%"
    24<num><percent> : "24%"
    25<num><percent> : "25%"
    26<num><percent> : "26%"
    27<num><percent> : "27%"
    28<num><percent> : "28%"
    29<num><percent> : "29%"
    30<num><percent> : "30%"
    31<num><percent> : "31%"
    32<num><percent> : "32%"
    33<num><percent> : "33%"
    34<num><percent> : "34%"
    35<num><percent> : "35%"
    36<num><percent> : "36%"
    37<num><percent> : "37%"
    38<num><percent> : "38%"
    39<num><percent> : "39%"
    40<num><percent> : "40%"
    41<num><percent> : "41%"
    42<num><percent> : "42%"
    43<num><percent> : "43%"
    44<num><percent> : "44%"
    45<num><percent> : "45%"
    46<num><percent> : "46%"
    47<num><percent> : "47%"
    48<num><percent> : "48%"
    49<num><percent> : "49%"
    50<num><percent> : "50%"
    51<num><percent> : "51%"
    52<num><percent> : "52%"
    53<num><percent> : "53%"
    54<num><percent> : "54%"
    55<num><percent> : "55%"
    56<num><percent> : "56%"
    57<num><percent> : "57%"
    58<num><percent> : "58%"
    59<num><percent> : "59%"
    60<num><percent> : "60%"
    61<num><percent> : "61%"
    62<num><percent> : "62%"
    63<num><percent> : "63%"
    64<num><percent> : "64%"
    65<num><percent> : "65%"
    66<num><percent> : "66%"
    67<num><percent> : "67%"
    68<num><percent> : "68%"
    69<num><percent> : "69%"
    70<num><percent> : "70%"
    71<num><percent> : "71%"
    72<num><percent> : "72%"
    73<num><percent> : "73%"
    74<num><percent> : "74%"
    75<num><percent> : "75%"
    76<num><percent> : "76%"
    77<num><percent> : "77%"
    78<num><percent> : "78%"
    79<num><percent> : "79%"
    80<num><percent> : "80%"
    81<num><percent> : "81%"
    82<num><percent> : "82%"
    83<num><percent> : "83%"
    84<num><percent> : "84%"
    85<num><percent> : "85%"
    86<num><percent> : "86%"
    87<num><percent> : "87%"
    88<num><percent> : "88%"
    89<num><percent> : "89%"
    90<num><percent> : "90%"
    91<num><percent> : "91%"
    92<num><percent> : "92%"
    93<num><percent> : "93%"
    94<num><percent> : "94%"
    95<num><percent> : "95%"
    96<num><percent> : "96%"
    97<num><percent> : "97%"
    98<num><percent> : "98%"
    99<num><percent> : "99%"
    100<num><percent> : "100%"
